Nebraska, session 109, LB694.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 18-1724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-1724 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all cities and
villages in this state shall have the power by ordinance to define,
regulate, suppress, and prevent discrimination on the basis of race,
color, creed, religion, ancestry, sex, marital status, national origin,
familial status as defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in
section 20-308.01, or age, or military or veteran status in employment,
public accommodation, and housing and may provide for the enforcement of
such ordinances by providing appropriate penalties for the violation
thereof. It shall not be an unlawful employment practice to refuse
employment based on a policy of not employing both spouses if such policy
is equally applied to both sexes.
Sec. 2. Section 20-113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-113 (1) Any incorporated city may enact ordinances and any county
may adopt resolutions which are substantially equivalent to the Age
Discrimination in Employment Act, the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice
Act, the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, and sections 20-126 to 20-143 and
48-1219 to 48-1227 or which are more comprehensive than such acts and
sections in the protection of civil rights. No such ordinance or
resolution shall place a duty or liability on any person, other than an
employer, employment agency, or labor organization, for acts similar to
those prohibited by section 48-1115. Such ordinance or resolution may
include authority for a local agency to seek an award of damages or other
equitable relief on behalf of the complainant by the filing of a petition
in the district court in the county with appropriate jurisdiction. The
local agency shall have within its authority jurisdiction substantially
equivalent to or more comprehensive than the Equal Opportunity Commission
or other enforcement agencies provided under such acts and sections and
shall have authority to order backpay and other equitable relief or to
-2-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
enforce such orders or relief in the district court with appropriate
jurisdiction. Certified copies of such ordinances or resolutions shall be
transmitted to the commission. When the commission determines that any
such city or county has enacted an ordinance or adopted a resolution that
is substantially equivalent to such acts and sections or is more
comprehensive than such acts and sections in the protection of civil
rights and has established a local agency to administer such ordinance or
resolution, the commission may thereafter refer all complaints arising in
such city or county to the appropriate local agency. All complaints
arising within a city shall be referred to the appropriate agency in such
city when both the city and the county in which the city is located have
established agencies pursuant to this section. When the commission refers
a complaint to a local agency, it shall take no further action on such
complaint if the local agency proceeds promptly to handle such complaint
pursuant to the local ordinance or resolution. If the commission
determines that a local agency is not handling a complaint with
reasonable promptness or that the protection of the rights of the parties
or the interests of justice require such action, the commission may
regain jurisdiction of the complaint and proceed to handle it in the same
manner as other complaints which are not referred to local agencies. In
cases of conflict between this section and section 20-332, for complaints
subject to the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, section 20-332 shall control.
(2)(a) Any club which has been issued a license by the Nebraska
Liquor Control Commission to sell, serve, or dispense alcoholic liquor
shall have that license revoked if the club discriminates because of
race, color, religion, sex, familial status as defined in section 20-311,
disability as defined in section 20-308.01, or national origin, or
military or veteran status in the sale, serving, or dispensing of
alcoholic liquor to any person who is a guest of a member of such club.
(b) The procedure for revocation shall be as prescribed in sections
53-134.04, 53-1,115, and 53-1,116.
-3-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(c) This subsection does not prohibit a club from, on an otherwise
nondiscriminatory basis, limiting admission or service to veterans or
servicemembers or their family members or providing discounts or other
benefits to veterans or servicemembers or their family members.
Sec. 3. Section 20-132, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-132 All persons within this state shall be entitled to a full and
equal enjoyment of any place of public accommodation, as defined in
sections 20-132 to 20-143, without discrimination or segregation on the
grounds of race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, or
ancestry, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 4. Section 20-134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-134 (1) Any person who directly or indirectly refuses, withholds
from, denies, or attempts to refuse, withhold, or deny, to any other
person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, services, or
privileges, or who segregates any person in a place of public
accommodation on the basis of race, creed, color, sex, religion, national
origin, disability, or ancestry, or military or veteran status, shall be
guilty of discriminatory practice and shall be subject to the penalties
of sections 20-132 to 20-143.
(2) It is not a discriminatory practice under sections 20-132 to
20-143 for a person or a place of public accommodation to, on an
otherwise nondiscriminatory basis, limit admission or service to veterans
or servicemembers or their family members or provide discounts or other
benefits to veterans or servicemembers or their family members.
Sec. 5. Section 20-139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-139 The Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123, 20-124,
and 20-132 to 20-143 shall be administered by the Equal Opportunity
Commission, except that the State Fire Marshal shall administer the act
-4-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
and sections as they relate to accessibility standards and specifications
set forth in sections 81-5,147 and 81-5,148. The county attorneys are
granted the authority to enforce such act and sections 20-123, 20-124,
and 20-132 to 20-143 and shall possess the same powers and duties with
respect thereto as the commission. If a complaint is filed with the
county attorney, the commission shall be notified. Powers granted to and
duties imposed upon the commission pursuant to such act and sections
shall be in addition to the provisions of the Nebraska Fair Employment
Practice Act and shall not be construed to amend or restrict those
provisions. In carrying out the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections
20-123, 20-124, and 20-132 to 20-143, the commission shall have the power
to:
(1) Seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination in places of public
accommodation because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin,
familial status as defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in
section 20-308.01, or ancestry, or military or veteran status;
(2) Effectuate the purposes of sections 20-132 to 20-143 by
conference, conciliation, and persuasion so that persons may be
guaranteed their civil rights and goodwill may be fostered;
(3) Formulate policies to effectuate the purposes of sections 20-132
to 20-143 and make recommendations to agencies and officers of the state
or local subdivisions of government in aid of such policies and purposes;
(4) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
powers granted by the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123,
20-124, and 20-132 to 20-143, subject to the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act. The commission shall, not later than one
hundred eighty days after September 6, 1991, issue draft rules and
regulations to implement subsection (3) of section 20-336, which
regulations may incorporate regulations of the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development as applicable;
(5) Designate one or more members of the commission or a member of
-5-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
the commission staff to conduct investigations of any complaint alleging
discrimination because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin,
familial status, disability, or ancestry, or military or veteran status,
attempt to resolve such complaint by conference, conciliation, and
persuasion, and conduct such conciliation meetings and conferences as are
deemed necessary to resolve a particular complaint, which meetings shall
be held in the county in which the complaint arose;
(6) Determine that probable cause exists for crediting the
allegations of a complaint;
(7) Determine that a complaint cannot be resolved by conference,
conciliation, or persuasion, such determination to be made only at a
meeting where a quorum is present;
(8) Dismiss a complaint when it is determined there is not probable
cause to credit the allegations;
(9) Hold hearings, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance,
administer oaths, take the testimony of any person under oath, and in
connection therewith require for examination any books or papers relating
to any matter under investigation or in question before the commission;
and
(10) Issue publications and the results of studies and research
which will tend to promote goodwill and minimize or eliminate
discrimination because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin,
familial status, disability, or ancestry, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 6. Section 20-317, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-317 Restrictive covenant shall mean any specification limiting
the transfer, rental, or lease of any housing because of race, creed,
religion, color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, or
ancestry, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 7. Section 20-318, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-6-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
20-318 Except as exempted by section 20-322, it shall be unlawful
to:
(1) Refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer,
refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of or otherwise make
unavailable or deny, refuse to show, or refuse to receive and transmit an
offer for a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or
veteran status;
(2) Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling or in the provision of
services or facilities in connection therewith because of race, color,
religion, national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or
military or veteran status;
(3) Make, print, publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published
any notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or
rental of a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or
discrimination based on race, color, religion, national origin,
disability, familial status, or sex, or military or veteran status or an
intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination;
(4) Represent to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or
veteran status that any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale,
or rental when such dwelling is in fact so available;
(5) Cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record
concerning the race, color, religion, national origin, disability,
familial status, or sex, or military or veteran status of a person
seeking to purchase, rent, or lease any housing;
(6) Include in any transfer, sale, rental, or lease of housing any
restrictive covenants or honor or exercise or attempt to honor or
exercise any restrictive covenant pertaining to housing;
(7) Discharge or demote an employee or agent or discriminate in the
-7-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
compensation of such employee or agent because of such employee's or
agent's compliance with the Nebraska Fair Housing Act; and
(8) Induce or attempt to induce, for profit, any person to sell or
rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective
entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race,
color, religion, national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or
military or veteran status.
Sec. 8. Section 20-320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-320 (1) Except as exempted by section 20-322, it It shall be
unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging
in transactions related to residential real estate to discriminate
against any person in making available such a transaction or in the terms
or conditions of such a transaction because of race, color, religion,
sex, disability, familial status, or national origin, or military or
veteran status.
(2) For purposes of this section, transaction related to residential
real estate shall mean any of the following:
(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial
assistance:
(i) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or
maintaining a dwelling; or
(ii) Secured by residential real estate; or
(b) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real
property.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person engaged in the
business of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into
consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, disability, or familial status, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 9. Section 20-321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-8-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
20-321 It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or
membership or participation in any multiple listing service, real estate
brokers organization, or other service, organization, or facility
relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or to
discriminate against any person in the terms or conditions of such
access, membership, or participation on account of race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or
veteran status.
Sec. 10. Section 20-322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-322 (1) Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Housing Act shall prohibit a
religious organization, association, or society or any nonprofit
institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled by or in
conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society from
limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of a dwelling which it owns or
operates for other than commercial purposes to persons of the same
religion or from giving preferences to such persons unless membership in
such religion is restricted on account of race, color, national origin,
disability, familial status, or sex, or military or veteran status.
(2) Nothing in the act shall prohibit a private club not in fact
open to the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or
purposes provides lodgings which it owns or operates for other than
commercial purposes, from limiting the rental or occupancy of such
lodging to its members or from giving preference to its members.
(3) Nothing in the act shall prohibit or limit the right of any
person or his or her authorized representative to refuse to rent a room
or rooms in his or her own home for any reason or for no reason or to
change tenants in his or her own home as often as desired, except that
this exception shall not apply to any person who makes available for
rental or occupancy more than four sleeping rooms to a person or family
within his or her own home.
-9-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(4)(a) Nothing in the act shall limit the applicability of any
reasonable local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants
permitted to occupy a dwelling, and nothing in the act regarding familial
status shall apply with respect to housing for older persons.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, housing for older persons shall
mean housing:
(i) Provided under any state program that the commission determines
is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons as
defined in the program;
(ii) Intended for and solely occupied by persons sixty-two years of
age or older; or
(iii) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person
fifty-five years of age or older per unit. In determining whether housing
qualifies as housing for older persons under this subdivision, the
commission shall develop regulations which require at least the following
factors:
(A) The existence of significant facilities and services
specifically designed to meet the physical or social needs of older
persons or, if the provision of such facilities and services is not
practicable, that such housing is necessary to provide important housing
opportunities for older persons;
(B) That at least eighty percent of the units are occupied by at
least one person fifty-five years of age or older per unit; and
(C) The publication of and adherence to policies and procedures
which demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing
for persons fifty-five years of age or older.
(c) Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for
older persons by reason of:
(i) Persons residing in the housing as of September 6, 1991, who do
not meet the age requirements of subdivision (b)(ii) or (iii) of this
subsection if succeeding occupants of the housing meet the age
-10-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
requirements; or
(ii) Unoccupied units if the units are reserved for occupancy by
persons who meet the age requirements.
(5) Nothing in the act shall prohibit conduct against a person
because such person has been convicted by any court of competent
jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled
substance as defined in section 28-401.
(6) Nothing in the act shall prohibit otherwise nondiscriminatory
conduct intended to benefit veterans or servicemembers or their family
members, such as providing housing limited to veterans or servicemembers
or their family members, providing favorable conditions of loans, leases,
mortgages, or contracts, or otherwise offering benefits that are limited
to veterans or servicemembers or their family members.
Sec. 11. Section 20-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
20-325 The commission shall:
(1) Make studies with respect to the nature and extent of
discriminatory housing practices in representative urban, suburban, and
rural communities throughout the state;
(2) Publish and disseminate reports, recommendations, and
information derived from such studies, including an annual report to the
Legislature to be submitted electronically:
(a) Specifying the nature and extent of progress made statewide in
eliminating discriminatory housing practices and furthering the purposes
of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, obstacles remaining to achieving equal
housing opportunity, and recommendations for further legislative or
executive action; and
(b) Containing tabulations of the number of instances and the
reasons therefor in the preceding year in which:
(i) Investigations have not been completed as required by
subdivision (1)(b) of section 20-326;
-11-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(ii) Determinations have not been made within the time specified in
section 20-333; and
(iii) Hearings have not been commenced or findings and conclusions
have not been made as required by section 20-337;
(3) Cooperate with and render technical assistance to state, local,
and other public or private agencies, organizations, and institutions
which are formulating or carrying on programs to prevent or eliminate
discriminatory housing practices;
(4) Electronically submit an annual report to the Legislature and
make available to the public data on the age, race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, and sex, and military or
veteran status of persons and households who are applicants for,
participants in, or beneficiaries or potential beneficiaries of programs
administered by the commission. In order to develop the data to be
included and made available to the public under this subdivision, the
commission shall, without regard to any other provision of law, collect
such information relating to those characteristics as the commission
determines to be necessary or appropriate;
(5) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, subject to the
approval of the members of the commission, regarding the investigative
and conciliation process that provide for testing standards, fundamental
due process, and notice to the parties of their rights and
responsibilities; and
(6) Have authority to enter into agreements with the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development in cooperative agreements
under the Fair Housing Assistance Program. The commission shall further
have the authority to enter into agreements with testing organizations to
assist in investigative activities. The commission shall not enter into
any agreements under which compensation to the testing organization is
partially or wholly based on the number of conciliations, settlements,
and reasonable cause determinations.
-12-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Sec. 12. Section 23-2525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-2525 The county personnel officer shall, with the assistance of
two advisory groups, one of classified employees and one of department
heads, prepare and submit to the personnel policy board proposed
personnel rules and regulations for the classified service. He or she
shall give reasonable notice thereof to the heads of all agencies,
departments, county employee associations, and institutions affected
thereby, and they shall be given an opportunity, upon request, to appear
before the board and present their views thereon. The personnel policy
board shall submit the rules and regulations for adoption or amendment
and adoption by resolution of the board of county commissioners.
Amendments thereto shall be made in the same manner. The rules and
regulations shall provide:
(1) For a single integrated classification plan covering all
positions in the county service except those expressly exempt from the
County Civil Service Act, which shall group all positions into defined
classes containing a descriptive class title and a code identifying each
class, and which shall be based on similarity of duties performed and
responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may reasonably
be required and the same schedule of pay may be equitably applied to all
positions in the same class. After the classification plan has been
approved by the personnel policy board, the county personnel officer
shall be responsible for the administration and maintenance of the plan
and for the allocation of each classified position. Any employee affected
by the allocation of a position to a class shall, upon request, be given
a reasonable opportunity to be heard thereon by the personnel policy
board who shall issue an advisory opinion to the personnel officer;
(2) For a compensation plan for all employees in the classified
service, comprising salary schedules, hours of work, premium payments,
special allowances, and fringe benefits, considering the amount of money
-13-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
available, the prevailing rates of pay in government and private
employment, the cost of living, the level of each class of position in
the classification plan, and other relevant factors. Initial,
intervening, and maximum rates of pay for each class shall be established
to provide for steps in salary advancement without change of duty in
recognition of demonstrated quality and length of service. The
compensation plan and amendments thereto shall be adopted in the manner
prescribed for rules and regulations and shall in no way limit the
authority of the board of county commissioners relative to appropriations
for salary and wage expenditures;
(3) For open competitive examinations to test the relative fitness
of applicants for the respective positions. Competitive examination shall
not be required for transferred employees transferring from positions in
the state or a political subdivision to positions in the county pursuant
to a merger of services or transferred employees transferring from
positions in the state or a political subdivision to positions in the
county due to the assumption of functions of the state or a political
subdivision by the county. The rules and regulations shall provide for
the public announcement of the holding of examinations and shall
authorize the personnel officer to prescribe examination procedures and
to place the names of successful candidates on eligible lists in
accordance with their respective ratings. Examinations may be assembled
or unassembled and may include various job-related examining techniques,
such as rating training and experience, written tests, oral interviews,
recognition of professional licensing, performance tests, investigations,
and any other measures of ability to perform the duties of the position.
Examinations shall be scored objectively and employment registers shall
be established in the order of final score. Certification of eligibility
for appointment to vacancies shall be in accordance with a formula which
limits selection by the hiring department from among the highest ranking
available and eligible candidates, but which also permits selective
-14-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
certification under appropriate conditions as prescribed in the rules and
regulations;
(4) For promotions which shall give appropriate consideration to
examinations and to record of performance, seniority, and conduct.
Vacancies shall be filled by promotion whenever practicable and in the
best interest of the service, and preference may be given to employees
within the department in which the vacancy occurs;
(5) For the rejection of candidates who fail to comply with
reasonable requirements of the personnel officer in regard to such
factors as physical conditions, training, and experience or who have been
guilty of infamous or disgraceful conduct, who are addicted to alcohol or
narcotics, or who have attempted any deception or fraud in connection
with an examination;
(6) For prohibiting Prohibiting disqualification of any person from
taking an examination, from promotion, or from holding a position because
of:
(a) Race, national origin, physical disabilities, age, or political
or religious opinions or affiliations;
(b) Sex race, sex, unless it constitutes a bona fide occupational
qualification; , or national origin, physical disabilities, age,
political or religious opinions or affiliations
(c) Military or veteran status, subject to section 38 of this act; ,
or
(d) Other other factors which have no bearing upon the individual's
fitness to hold the position;
(7) For a period of probation not to exceed one year before
appointment or promotion may be made complete, and during which period a
probationer may be separated from his or her position without the right
of appeal or hearing except as provided in section 23-2531. After a
probationer has been separated, he or she may again be placed on the
eligible list at the discretion of the personnel officer. The rules shall
-15-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
provide that a probationer shall be dropped from the payroll at the
expiration of his or her probationary period if, within ten days prior
thereto, the appointing authority has notified the personnel officer in
writing that the services of the employee have been unsatisfactory;
(8) When an employee has been promoted but fails to satisfactorily
perform the duties of the new position during the probationary period, he
or she shall be returned to a position comparable to that held
immediately prior to promotion at the current salary of such position;
(9) For temporary or seasonal appointments of limited terms of not
to exceed one year;
(10) For part-time appointment where the employee accrues benefits
of full-time employment on a basis proportional to the time worked;
(11) For emergency employment for not more than thirty days with or
without examination, with the consent of the county personnel officer and
department head;
(12) For provisional employment without competitive examination when
there is no appropriate eligible list available. No such provisional
employment shall continue longer than six months, nor shall successive
provisional appointments be allowed;
(13) For transfer from a position in one department to a similar
position in another department involving similar qualifications, duties,
responsibilities, and salary ranges;
(14) For the transfer of employees of the state or a political
subdivision to the county pursuant to a merger of services or due to the
assumption of functions of the state or a political subdivision by the
county;
(15) For layoff by reason of lack of funds or work or abolition of
the position, or material change in duties or organization, for the
layoff of nontenured employees first, and for reemployment of permanent
employees so laid off, giving consideration in both layoff and
reemployment to performance record and seniority in service;
-16-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(16) For establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances
and complaints;
(17) For hours of work, holidays, and attendance regulations in the
various classes of positions in the classified service, and for annual,
sick, and special leaves of absence, with or without pay, or at reduced
pay;
(18) For the development of employee morale, safety, and training
programs;
(19) For a procedure whereby an appointing authority may suspend,
reduce, demote, or dismiss an employee for misconduct, inefficiency,
incompetence, insubordination, malfeasance, or other unfitness to render
effective service and for the investigation and public hearing of appeals
of such suspended, reduced, demoted, or dismissed employee;
(20) For granting of leave without pay to a permanent employee to
accept a position in the unclassified service, and for his or her return
to a position comparable to that formerly held in the classified service
at the conclusion of such service;
(21) For regulation covering political activity of employees in the
classified service; and
(22) For other regulations not inconsistent with the County Civil
Service Act and which may be necessary for its effective implementation.
Sec. 13. Section 23-2531, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-2531 (1) Discrimination against any person in recruitment,
examination, appointment, training, promotion, retention, discipline, or
any other aspect of personnel administration because of political or
religious opinions or affiliations or because of race, national origin,
or other nonmerit factors shall be prohibited. Discrimination on the
basis of age or sex or physical disability shall be prohibited unless
specific age, sex, or physical requirements constitute a bona fide
occupational qualification necessary to proper and efficient
-17-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
administration. Subject to section 38 of this act, discrimination on the
basis of military or veteran status shall be prohibited. The rules and
regulations shall provide for appeals in cases of alleged discrimination
to the personnel policy board whose determination shall be binding upon a
finding of discrimination.
(2) No person shall make any false statement, certificate, mark,
rating, or report with regard to any test, certification, or appointment
made under the County Civil Service Act or in any manner commit or
attempt to commit any fraud preventing the impartial execution of the act
and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the act.
(3) No person shall, directly or indirectly, give, render, pay,
offer, solicit, or accept any money, service, or other valuable
consideration for or on account of any appointment, proposed appointment,
promotion, or proposed promotion to, or any advantage in, a position in
the classified service.
(4) No employee of the personnel office, examiner, or other person
shall defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in his or her right to
examination, eligibility, certification, or appointment under the act, or
furnish to any person any special or secret information for the purpose
of affecting the rights or prospects of any persons with respect to
employment in the classified service.
Sec. 14. Section 23-2541, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-2541 The personnel policy board, if created, shall, with the
assistance of two advisory groups, one of classified employees and one of
department heads, adopt proposed personnel rules and regulations for the
classified service and provide reasonable notice of proposed rules and
regulations to the heads of all agencies, departments, county employee
associations, and institutions affected thereby. Any person affected by
such rules and regulations shall be given an opportunity, upon request,
to appear before the personnel policy board and present his or her views
-18-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
on the rules and regulations. The personnel policy board shall submit
proposed rules and regulations or amendments for adoption by the county
board. The county board may consider and adopt only personnel rules and
regulations or amendments proposed by the personnel policy board and may
not repeal or revoke a rule or regulation except upon the recommendation
of the personnel policy board.
The rules and regulations or amendments may provide:
(1) For a single integrated classification plan covering all
positions in the county service except those expressly exempt from
sections 23-2534 to 23-2544, which shall (a) group all positions into
defined classes containing a descriptive class title and a code
identifying each class and (b) be based on similarity of duties performed
and responsibilities assumed, so that the same qualifications may
reasonably be required and the same schedule of pay may be equitably
applied to all positions in the same class. After the classification plan
has been approved by the personnel policy board, the county personnel
officer shall be responsible for the administration and maintenance of
the plan and for the allocation of each classified position. Any employee
affected by the allocation of a position to a class shall, upon request,
be given a reasonable opportunity to be heard on such allocation by the
personnel policy board which shall issue an advisory opinion to the
county personnel officer;
(2) For a compensation plan for all employees in the classified
service, comprising salary schedules, attendance regulations, premium
payments, special allowances, and fringe benefits, considering the amount
of money available, the prevailing rates of pay in government and private
employment, the cost of living, the level of each class of position in
the classification plan, and other relevant factors. The compensation
plan and amendments to such plan shall be adopted in the manner
prescribed for rules and regulations and shall in no way limit the
authority of the county board relative to appropriations for salary and
-19-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
wage expenditures;
(3) For open competitive examinations to test the relative fitness
of applicants for the respective positions. The rules and regulations
shall provide for the public announcement of the holding of examinations
and shall authorize the county personnel officer to prescribe examination
procedures and to place the names of successful candidates on eligible
lists in accordance with their respective ratings. Examinations may be
assembled or unassembled and may include various job-related examining
techniques, such as rating training and experience, written tests, oral
interviews, recognition of professional licensing, performance tests,
investigations, and any other measures of ability to perform the duties
of the position. Examinations shall be scored objectively and employment
registers shall be established in the order of final score. Certification
of eligibility for appointment to vacancies shall be in accordance with a
formula which limits selection by the hiring department from among the
highest ranking available and eligible candidates, but which also permits
selective certification under appropriate conditions as prescribed in the
rules and regulations;
(4) For promotions which shall give appropriate consideration to
examinations and to record of performance, seniority, and conduct.
Vacancies shall be filled by promotion whenever practicable and in the
best interest of the service and preference may be given to employees
within the department in which the vacancy occurs;
(5) For the rejection of candidates who fail to comply with
reasonable requirements of the county personnel officer in regard to such
factors as physical conditions, training, and experience, who have been
guilty of infamous or disgraceful conduct, who are currently abusing
alcohol or narcotics, or who have attempted any deception or fraud in
connection with an examination;
(6) For prohibiting disqualification of any person from (a) taking
an examination, (b) promotion, or (c) holding a position, solely because
-20-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
of:
(a) Race race, sex, national origin, physical disabilities, age,
political or religious opinions or affiliations; , or
(b) Military or veteran status, subject to section 38 of this act;
or
(c) Other other factors which have no bearing upon the individual's
fitness to hold the position;
(7) For a period of probation, not to exceed one year, before
appointment or promotion may be made complete and during which period a
probationer may be separated from his or her position without the right
of appeal or hearing. After a probationer has been separated, he or she
may again be placed on the eligible list at the discretion of the county
personnel officer. The rules and regulations shall provide that a
probationer shall be dropped from the payroll at the expiration of his or
her probationary period if, within ten days prior thereto, the appointing
authority has notified the county personnel officer in writing that the
services of the employee have been unsatisfactory;
(8) For temporary or seasonal appointments of limited terms of not
to exceed one year;
(9) For part-time appointment in which the employee accrues benefits
of full-time employment on a basis proportional to the time worked;
(10) For emergency employment for not more than thirty days with or
without examination with the consent of the county personnel officer and
department head;
(11) For provisional employment without competitive examination when
there is no appropriate eligible list available. Provisional employment
shall not continue longer than six months and successive provisional
appointments shall not be allowed;
(12) For transfer from a position in one department to a similar
position in another department involving similar qualifications, duties,
responsibilities, and salary ranges;
-21-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(13) For layoff by reason of lack of funds or work, abolition of the
position, or material change in duties or organization, for the layoff of
nontenured employees first, and for reemployment of permanent employees
so laid off, giving consideration in both layoff and reemployment to
performance record and seniority in service;
(14) For establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances
and complaints;
(15) For holidays, for attendance regulations in the various classes
of positions in the classified service, and for annual, sick, and special
leaves of absence, with or without pay or at reduced pay;
(16) For the development of employee morale, safety, and training
programs;
(17) For a procedure whereby an appointing authority may suspend,
reduce, demote, or dismiss an employee for misconduct, inefficiency,
incompetence, insubordination, malfeasance, or other unfitness to render
effective service and for the investigation and public hearing of appeals
of such suspended, reduced, demoted, or dismissed employee;
(18) For granting of leave without pay to a permanent employee to
accept a position in the unclassified service and for his or her return
to a position comparable to that formerly held in the classified service
at the conclusion of such service;
(19) For regulation covering political activity of employees in the
classified service; and
(20) For other rules and regulations not inconsistent with sections
23-2534 to 23-2544 and the implementation of personnel policy in the
county.
Sec. 15. Section 25-1645, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
25-1645 The Legislature hereby declares that it is the intent and
purpose of the Jury Selection Act to create a jury system which will
ensure that:
-22-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(1) All persons selected for jury service are selected at random
from a fair cross section of the population of the area served by the
court;
(2) All qualified citizens have the opportunity to be considered for
jury service;
(3) All qualified citizens fulfill their obligation to serve as
jurors when summoned for that purpose; and
(4) No citizen is excluded from jury service in this state as a
result of discrimination based upon race, color, religion, sex, national
origin, or economic status, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 16. Section 29-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-401 Every sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal,
security guard, police officer, or peace officer as defined in
subdivision (15) of section 49-801 shall arrest and detain any person
found violating any law of this state or any legal ordinance of any city
or incorporated village until a legal warrant can be obtained, except
that (1) any such law enforcement officer taking a juvenile under the age
of eighteen years into his or her custody for any violation herein
defined shall proceed as set forth in sections 43-248, 43-248.01, 43-250,
43-251, 43-251.01, and 43-253 and (2) the court in which the juvenile is
to appear shall not accept a plea from the juvenile until finding that
the parents of the juvenile have been notified or that reasonable efforts
to notify such parents have been made as provided in section 43-250.
Sec. 17. Section 32-221, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-221 (1) The election commissioner shall appoint precinct and
district inspectors, judges of election, and clerks of election to assist
the election commissioner in conducting elections on election day. In
counties with a population of less than four hundred thousand inhabitants
as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, judges and
-23-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
clerks of election and inspectors shall be appointed at least thirty days
prior to the statewide primary election, shall hold office for terms of
two years or until their successors are appointed and qualified for the
next statewide primary election, and shall serve at all elections in the
county during their terms of office. In counties with a population of
four hundred thousand or more inhabitants as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census, judges and clerks of election shall be
appointed at least thirty days prior to the first election for which
appointments are necessary and shall serve for at least four elections.
(2) Judges and clerks of election may be selected at random from a
cross section of the population of the county. All qualified citizens
shall have the opportunity to be considered for service. All qualified
citizens shall fulfill their obligation to serve as judges or clerks of
election as prescribed by the election commissioner. No citizen shall be
excluded from service as a result of discrimination based upon race,
color, religion, sex, national origin, or economic status, or military or
veteran status. No citizen shall be excluded from service unless excused
by reason of ill health or other good and sufficient reason.
(3) All persons appointed shall be of good repute and character, be
able to read and write the English language, and except as otherwise
provided in subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section 32-223, be
registered voters in the county. No candidate at an election shall be
appointed as a judge or clerk of election or inspector for such election
other than a candidate for delegate to a county, state, or national
political party convention.
(4) If a vacancy occurs in the office of judge or clerk of election
or inspector, the election commissioner shall fill such vacancy in
accordance with section 32-223. If any judge or clerk of election or
inspector fails to appear at the hour appointed for the opening of the
polls, the remaining officers shall notify the election commissioner,
select a registered voter to serve in place of the absent officer if so
-24-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
directed by the election commissioner, and proceed to conduct the
election. If the election commissioner finds that a judge or clerk of
election or inspector does not possess all the qualifications prescribed
in this section or if any judge or clerk of election or inspector is
guilty of neglecting the duties of the office or of any official
misconduct, the election commissioner shall remove the person and fill
the vacancy.
Sec. 18. Section 32-230, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-230 (1) As provided in subsection (4) of this section, the
precinct committeeman and committeewoman of each political party shall
appoint a receiving board consisting of three judges of election and two
clerks of election. The chairperson of the county central committee of
each political party shall send the names of the appointments to the
county clerk no later than February 1 prior to the primary election.
(2) If no names are submitted by the chairperson, the county clerk
shall appoint judges or clerks of election from the appropriate political
party. Judges and clerks of election may be selected at random from a
cross section of the population of the county. All qualified citizens
shall have the opportunity to be considered for service. All qualified
citizens shall fulfill their obligation to serve as judges or clerks of
election as prescribed by the county clerk. No citizen shall be excluded
from service as a result of discrimination based upon race, color,
religion, sex, national origin, or economic status, or military or
veteran status. No citizen shall be excluded from service unless excused
by reason of ill health or other good and sufficient reason.
(3) The county clerk may allow persons serving on a receiving board
to serve for part of the time the polls are open and appoint other
persons to serve on the same receiving board for the remainder of the
time the polls are open.
(4) In each precinct at any one time, one judge and one clerk of
-25-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
election shall be appointed from the political party casting the highest
number of votes in the county for Governor or for President of the United
States in the immediately preceding general election, one judge and one
clerk shall be appointed from the political party casting the next
highest number of votes in the county for Governor or for President of
the United States in the immediately preceding general election, and one
judge shall be appointed from the political party casting the third
highest number of votes in the county for Governor or for President of
the United States in the immediately preceding general election. If the
political party casting the third highest number of votes cast less than
ten percent of the total vote cast in the county at the immediately
preceding general election, the political party casting the highest
number of votes at the immediately preceding general election shall be
entitled to two judges and one clerk.
(5) The county clerk may appoint registered voters to serve in case
of a vacancy among any of the judges or clerks of election or in addition
to the judges and clerks in any precinct when necessary to meet any
situation that requires additional judges and clerks. Such appointees may
include registered voters unaffiliated with any political party. Such
appointees shall serve at subsequent or special elections as determined
by the county clerk.
(6) The county clerk may appoint an elector residing outside the
county as a precinct inspector, district inspector, judge of election, or
clerk of election if the elector resides in a county which conducts all
elections by mail pursuant to section 32-960.
(7) If authorized by the Secretary of State and registered voters of
the county are unavailable, the county clerk may appoint an elector
residing outside the county as a precinct inspector, district inspector,
judge of election, or clerk of election.
(8) The county clerk may appoint a person who is at least sixteen
years old but is not eligible to register to vote as a clerk of election.
-26-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Such clerk of election shall meet the requirements of subsection (1) of
section 32-231, except that such clerk shall not be required to be a
registered voter. No more than one clerk of election appointed under this
subsection shall serve at any precinct. A clerk of election appointed
under this subsection shall be considered a registered voter who is not
affiliated with a political party for purposes of this section.
Sec. 19. Section 39-210, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
39-210 To qualify to appear on a tourist-oriented directional sign
panel, an activity shall be licensed and approved by the state and local
agencies if required by law and be open to the public at least eight
hours per day, five days per week, including Saturdays or Sundays, during
the normal season of the activity, except that if the activity is a
winery, the winery shall be open at least twenty hours per week. The
activity, before qualifying to appear on a sign panel, shall provide to
the Department of Transportation assurance of its conformity with all
applicable laws relating to discrimination based on race, creed, color,
sex, national origin, ancestry, political affiliation, or religion, or
military or veteran status. If the activity violates any of such laws, it
shall lose its eligibility to appear on a tourist-oriented directional
sign panel. In addition, the qualifying activity shall be required to
remove any advertising device which was unlawfully erected or which is in
violation of section 39-202, 39-203, 39-204, 39-205, 39-206, 39-215,
39-216, or 39-220, any rule or regulation of the department, or any
federal rule or regulation relating to tourist-oriented directional sign
panels. The tourist-oriented directional sign panels shall conform to the
requirements of the Federal Beautification Act and the Manual on Uniform
Traffic Control Devices as adopted pursuant to section 60-6,118.
Sec. 20. Section 45-1056, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
45-1056 A licensee shall not refuse to enter into a loan or impose
-27-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
finance charges or other terms or conditions of credit more onerous than
those regularly extended by that licensee to borrowers of similar
economic backgrounds because of the age, color, creed, national origin,
political affiliation, race, religion, sex, marital status, or
disability, or military or veteran status of the borrower or because the
borrower receives public assistance, social security benefits, pension
benefits, or the like.
Sec. 21. Section 45-1303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
45-1303 (1) The Medical Debt Relief Program is established for the
purpose of discharging medical debt of eligible residents by contracting
with a medical debt relief coordinator as described in subsection (3) of
this section. The State Treasurer shall administer the program.
(2) Money appropriated to the State Treasurer or otherwise
contributed for the program shall be used exclusively for the program,
including contracting with a medical debt relief coordinator and
providing money to be used by the medical debt relief coordinator to
discharge medical debt of eligible residents. Money used in contracting
with a medical debt relief coordinator may also be used for the payment
of services provided by the medical debt relief coordinator to discharge
medical debt of eligible residents based on a budget approved by the
State Treasurer.
(3)(a) The State Treasurer shall enter into a contract with a
medical debt relief coordinator to purchase and discharge medical debt
owed by eligible residents with money allocated for the program.
(b) The State Treasurer shall implement a competitive bidding
process to determine which medical debt relief coordinator to use, unless
the State Treasurer determines that only a single medical debt relief
coordinator has the capacity and willingness to carry out the duties
specified in the Medical Debt Relief Act.
(c) In contracting with the State Treasurer, a medical debt relief
-28-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
coordinator shall adhere to the following:
(i) The medical debt relief coordinator shall review the medical
debt accounts of each health care provider willing to donate or sell
medical debt accounts in this state;
(ii) The medical debt relief coordinator may negotiate for and elect
to buy the dischargeable medical debt from a health care provider that
identifies the accounts described in subdivision (3)(c)(i) of this
section as a bad debt expense and agrees to sell the debt for less than
the original value;
(iii) After the purchase and discharge of medical debt from a health
care provider, the medical debt relief coordinator shall notify all
eligible residents whose medical debt has been discharged under the
program, in a manner approved by the State Treasurer, that they no longer
have specified medical debt owed to the relevant health care provider;
(iv) A medical debt relief coordinator shall make its best efforts
to ensure parity and equity in the purchasing and discharging of medical
debt to ensure that all eligible residents have an equal opportunity of
receiving medical debt relief regardless of their geographical location
or their race, color, religion, sex, disability, age, or national origin,
or military or veteran status;
(v) A medical debt relief coordinator shall report to the State
Treasurer summary statistics regarding eligible residents whose medical
debt has been discharged; and
(vi) A medical debt relief coordinator may not attempt to seek
payment from an eligible resident for medical debt purchased by the
medical debt relief coordinator.
(d) A medical debt relief coordinator shall continue to fulfill its
contractual obligations to the State Treasurer until all money contracted
to the medical debt relief coordinator is exhausted, regardless of
whether money allocated to the program has been exhausted.
(e) If a medical debt relief coordinator attempts to seek payment
-29-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
from an eligible resident for medical debt purchased by the medical debt
relief coordinator or fails to carry out the responsibilities described
in its contract with the State Treasurer, the medical debt relief
coordinator shall be considered in breach of contract and the contract
provisions that apply in the case of a breach of contract shall apply.
(f) Health care providers that are willing to sell medical debt to
the medical debt relief coordinator shall provide necessary information
to, and otherwise coordinate with, the medical debt relief coordinator as
needed to carry out the purposes of the Medical Debt Relief Act.
Sec. 22. Section 48-215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-215 It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation,
engaged to any extent whatsoever in the State of Nebraska in the
production, manufacture, or distribution of military or naval material,
equipment, or supplies for the State of Nebraska or the government of the
United States, to refuse to employ any person in any capacity, if such
said person is a citizen and is qualified, on account of the race, color,
creed, religion, or national origin, or military or veteran status of
such said person.
Sec. 23. Section 48-628.13, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-628.13 Good cause for voluntarily leaving employment shall
include, but not be limited to, the following reasons:
(1) An individual has made all reasonable efforts to preserve the
employment but voluntarily leaves his or her work for the necessary
purpose of escaping abuse at the place of employment or abuse as defined
in section 42-903 between household members;
(2) An individual left his or her employment voluntarily due to a
bona fide non-work-connected illness or injury that prevented him or her
from continuing the employment or from continuing the employment without
undue risk of harm to the individual;
-30-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(3) An individual left his or her employment to accompany his or her
spouse to the spouse's employment in a different city or new military
duty station;
(4) An individual left his or her employment because his or her
employer required the employee to relocate;
(5)(a) An individual is a construction worker and left his or her
employment voluntarily for the purpose of accepting previously secured
insured work in the construction industry if the commissioner finds that:
(i)(A) The quit occurred within thirty days immediately prior to the
established termination date of the job which the individual voluntarily
leaves, (B) the specific starting date of the new job is prior to the
established termination date of the job which the worker quits, (C) the
new job offered employment for a longer period of time than remained
available on the job which the construction worker voluntarily quit, and
(D) the worker had worked at least twenty days or more at the new job
after the established termination date of the previous job unless the new
job was terminated by a contract cancellation; or
(ii)(A) The construction worksite of the job which the worker quit
was more than fifty miles from his or her place of residence, (B) the new
construction job was fifty or more miles closer to his or her residence
than the job which he or she quit, and (C) the worker actually worked
twenty days or more at the new job unless the new job was terminated by a
contract cancellation.
(b) The provisions of this subdivision (5) shall not apply if the
individual is separated from the new job under conditions resulting in a
disqualification from benefits under section 48-628.10 or 48-628.12;
(6) An individual accepted a voluntary layoff to avoid bumping
another worker;
(7) An individual left his or her employment as a result of being
directed to perform an illegal act;
(8) An individual left his or her employment because of unlawful
-31-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
discrimination or workplace harassment on the basis of race, sex, or age,
or military or veteran status;
(9) An individual left his or her employment because of unsafe
working conditions;
(10) An individual left his or her employment to attend school;
(11) An individual has made all reasonable efforts to preserve
employment but voluntarily leaves employment for the purpose of caring
for a family member with a serious health condition. For purposes of this
subdivision:
(a) Family member means:
(i) A biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, or a legal
ward of the individual or the individual's spouse or a person to whom the
individual or the individual's spouse stood in loco parentis when such
person was a minor child, regardless of the age or dependency status of
such child, stepchild, legal ward, or person;
(ii) A biological, adoptive, or foster parent, a stepparent, or a
legal guardian of the individual or the individual's spouse or a person
who stood in loco parentis to the individual or the individual's spouse
when the individual or the individual's spouse was a minor child;
(iii) The individual's spouse; or
(iv) A grandparent, grandchild, or sibling, whether of a biological,
foster, adoptive, or step relationship, of the individual or the
individual's spouse; and
(b) Serious health condition has the same meaning as in 29 U.S.C.
2611, as such section existed on January 1, 2021; or
(12) Equity and good conscience demand a finding of good cause.
Sec. 24. Section 48-1125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1125 Sections 48-1102 48-1101 to 48-1126 and sections 24, 25, and
38 of this act 48-1125 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Fair Employment Practice Act.
-32-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Sec. 25. Section 48-1101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1101 (1) It is the policy of this state to foster the employment
of all employable persons in the state on the basis of merit regardless
of their race, color, religion, sex, disability, or national origin, or
military or veteran status and to safeguard their right to obtain and
hold employment without discrimination because of their race, color,
religion, sex, disability, or national origin, or military or veteran
status. Denying equal opportunity for employment because of race, color,
religion, sex, disability, or national origin, or military or veteran
status is contrary to the principles of freedom and is a burden on the
objectives of the public policy of this state.
(2) Except for the veterans preference provided for in sections
48-225 to 48-231, the The policy of this state does not require any
person to employ an applicant for employment because of his or her race,
color, religion, sex, disability, or national origin, or military or
veteran status, and the policy of this state does not require any
employer, employment agency, labor organization, or joint labor-
management committee to grant preferential treatment to any individual or
to any group because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, or
national origin, or military or veteran status.
(3) It is the public policy of this state that all people in
Nebraska, both with and without disabilities, shall have the right and
opportunity to enjoy the benefits of living, working, and recreating
within this state. It is the intent of the Legislature that state and
local governments, Nebraska businesses, Nebraska labor organizations, and
Nebraskans with disabilities understand their rights and responsibilities
under the law regarding employment discrimination and the prevention of
discrimination on the basis of disability.
Sec. 26. Section 48-1104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-33-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
48-1104 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer:
(1) To fail or refuse to hire, to discharge, or to harass any
individual, or otherwise to discriminate against any individual with
respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment,
because of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status; or
(2) To limit, advertise, solicit, segregate, or classify employees
in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of
employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect such individual's
status as an employee, because of such individual's race, color,
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
military or veteran status.
Sec. 27. Section 48-1105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1105 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an
employment agency to:
(1) Fail fail or refuse to refer for employment, or otherwise to
discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, religion,
sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or
veteran status; or
(2) Classify to classify or refer for employment any individual on
the basis of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or
national origin, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 28. Section 48-1106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1106 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for a labor
organization:
(1) To exclude or to expel from its membership, or otherwise to
discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, religion,
sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or
veteran status;
-34-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(2) To limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify
or fail or refuse to refer for employment any individual, in any way
which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities, or would limit such employment opportunities or otherwise
adversely affect such individual's status as an employee or as an
applicant for employment, because of such individual's race, color,
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
military or veteran status; or
(3) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against
an individual in violation of this section.
Sec. 29. Section 48-1107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1107 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for any
employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-
the-job training programs, to discriminate against any individual because
of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national
origin, or military or veteran status, in admission to, or employment in,
any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training.
Sec. 30. Section 48-1108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1108 Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Fair
Employment Practice Act:
(1) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer
to hire and employ employees, for an employment agency to classify or
refer for employment any individual, for a labor organization to classify
its membership or to classify or refer for employment any individual, or
for an employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee
controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs to
admit or employ any individual in any such program on the basis of
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
-35-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
military or veteran status in those certain instances when religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran
status is a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to
the normal operation of that particular business or enterprise;
(2) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for a school,
college, university, or other educational institution or institution of
learning to hire and employ employees of a particular religion if such
school, college, university, or other educational institution or
institution of learning is, in whole or in substantial part, owned,
supported, controlled, or managed by a particular religion or by a
particular religious corporation, association, or society or if the
curriculum of such school, college, university, or other educational
institution of learning is directed toward the propagation of a
particular religion;
(3) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer
to enact any bona fide health and safety standard that regulates
characteristics associated with race if the employer demonstrates that:
(a) Without the implementation of such standard, it is reasonably
certain that the health and safety of the applicant, employee, or other
materially connected person will be impaired;
(b) The standard is adopted for nondiscriminatory reasons;
(c) The standard is applied equally; and
(d) The employer has engaged in good faith efforts to reasonably
accommodate the applicant or employee; and
(4) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for the Nebraska
State Patrol, a county sheriff, a city or village police department, or
any other law enforcement agency in this state or the Nebraska National
Guard to impose its own dress and grooming standards.
Sec. 31. Section 48-1111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1111 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Fair
-36-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Employment Practice Act, it shall not be an unlawful employment practice
for an employer to apply different standards of compensation, or
different terms, conditions, or privileges of employment pursuant to a
bona fide seniority or merit system or a system which measures earnings
by quantity or quality of production or to employees who work in
different locations, if such differences are not the result of an
intention to discriminate because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran
status, nor shall it be an unlawful employment practice for an employer
to give and to act upon the results of any professionally developed
ability test if such test, its administration, or action upon the results
is not designed, intended, or used to discriminate because of race,
color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
military or veteran status.
(2) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for a covered
entity to deny privileges of employment to an individual with a
disability when the qualification standards, tests, or selection criteria
that screen out or tend to screen out or otherwise deny a job or benefit
to an individual with a disability:
(a) Have been shown to be job-related and consistent with business
necessity and such performance cannot be accomplished by reasonable
accommodation, as required by the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act
and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990; or
(b) Include a requirement that an individual shall not pose a direct
threat, involving a significant risk to the health or safety of other
individuals in the workplace, that cannot be eliminated by reasonable
accommodation.
(3) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice to refuse
employment based on a policy of not employing both husband and wife if
such policy is equally applied to both sexes.
(4) (2) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Fair Employment
-37-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Practice Act, women affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
conditions shall be treated the same for all employment-related purposes,
including receipt of employee benefits, as other persons not so affected
but similar in their ability or inability to work, and nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to provide otherwise.
(5) This section shall not require an employer to provide employee
benefits for abortion except when medical complications have arisen from
an abortion.
(6) Nothing in this section shall preclude an employer from
providing employee benefits for abortion under fringe benefit programs or
otherwise affect bargaining agreements in regard to abortion.
Sec. 32. Section 48-1113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1113 Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall
be interpreted to require any employer, employment agency, labor
organization, or joint labor-management committee subject to the act to
grant preferential treatment to any individual or to any group because of
the race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national
origin, or military or veteran status of such individual or group on
account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total number
or percentage of persons of any race, color, religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status
employed by any employer, referred or classified for employment by any
employment agency or labor organization, admitted to membership or
classified by any labor organization, or admitted to, or employed in, any
apprenticeship or other training program, in comparison with the total
number or percentage of persons of such race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran
status in any community, section, or other area, or in the available work
force in any community, section, or other area.
Sec. 33. Section 48-1115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-38-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
amended to read:
48-1115 Except as provided in section 38 of this act and except for
the veterans preference provided for in sections 48-225 to 48-231 or
section 48-238, it It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an
employer, labor organization, or employment agency to print or publish or
cause to be printed or published any notice or advertisement relating to
employment by such an employer or membership in or any classification or
referral for employment by such a labor organization, or relating to any
classification or referral for employment by such an employment agency,
indicating any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination
based on race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or
national origin, or military or veteran status, except that such a notice
or advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation, specification or
discrimination based on religion, sex, disability, marital status, or
national origin, or military or veteran status when religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran
status is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment.
Sec. 34. Section 48-1117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1117 The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To receive, investigate, and pass upon charges of unlawful
employment practices anywhere in the state;
(2) To hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance,
administer oaths, and take the testimony of any person under oath and, in
connection therewith, to require the production for examination of any
books and papers relevant to any allegation of unlawful employment
practice pending before the commission. The commission may make rules as
to the issuance of subpoenas, subject to the approval by a constitutional
majority of the elected members of the Legislature;
(3) To cooperate with the federal government and with local agencies
to effectuate the purposes of the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act,
-39-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
including the sharing of information possessed by the commission on a
case that has also been filed with the federal government or local
agencies if both the employer and complainant have been notified of the
filing;
(4) To attempt to eliminate unfair employment practices by means of
conference, mediation, conciliation, arbitration, and persuasion;
(5) To require that every employer, employment agency, and labor
organization subject to the act shall (a) make and keep such records
relevant to the determinations of whether unlawful employment practices
have been or are being committed, (b) preserve such records for such
periods, and (c) make such reports therefrom, as the commission shall
prescribe by regulation or order, after public hearing, as reasonable,
necessary, or appropriate for the enforcement of the act or the
regulations or orders thereunder. The commission shall, by regulation,
require each employer, labor organization, and joint labor-management
committee subject to the act which controls an apprenticeship or other
training program to maintain such records as are reasonably necessary to
carry out the purposes of the act, including, but not limited to, a list
of applicants who wish to participate in such program, including the
chronological order in which such applications were received, and to
furnish to the commission, upon request, a detailed description of the
manner in which persons are selected to participate in the apprenticeship
or other training program. Any employer, employment agency, labor
organization, or joint labor-management committee which believes that the
application to it of any regulation or order issued under this section
would result in undue hardship may either apply to the commission for an
exemption from the application of such regulation or order or bring a
civil action in the district court for the district where such records
are kept. If the commission or the court, as the case may be, finds that
the application of the regulation or order to the employer, employment
agency, or labor organization in question would impose an undue hardship,
-40-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
the commission or the court, as the case may be, may grant appropriate
relief;
(6) To report, not less than once every two years, to the Clerk of
the Legislature and the Governor, on the hearings it has conducted and
the decisions it has rendered, the other work performed by it to carry
out the purposes of the act, and to make recommendations for such further
legislation concerning abuses and discrimination because of race, color,
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
military or veteran status, as may be desirable. The report shall also
include the number of complaints filed under the act alleging a violation
of subdivision (2) of section 48-1107.01 and the resolution of such
complaints. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically. Each member of the Legislature shall receive an
electronic copy of the report required by this subdivision by making a
request for it to the chairperson of the commission; and
(7) To adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry
out the duties prescribed in the act.
Sec. 35. Section 48-1119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1119 (1) In case of failure to eliminate any unlawful employment
practice by informal methods of conference, conciliation, persuasion,
mediation, or arbitration, the commission may order a public hearing. If
such hearing is ordered, the commission shall cause to be issued and
served a written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, requiring
the person, employer, labor organization, or employment agency named in
the complaint, hereinafter referred to as respondent, to answer such
charges at a hearing before the commission at a time and place which
shall be specified in such notice. Such hearing shall be within the
county where the alleged unlawful employment practice occurred. The
complainant shall be a party to the proceeding, and in the discretion of
the commission any other person whose testimony has a bearing on the
-41-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
matter may be allowed to intervene therein. Both the complainant and the
respondent, in addition to the commission, may introduce witnesses at the
hearing. The respondent may file a verified answer to the allegations of
the complaint and may appear at such hearing in person and with or
without counsel. Testimony or other evidence may be introduced by either
party. All evidence shall be under oath and a record thereof shall be
made and preserved. Such proceedings shall, so far as practicable, be
conducted in accordance with the rules of evidence applicable in the
district courts of the State of Nebraska, and shall be of public record.
(2) No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any
book, document, paper, or account in any investigation, or inquiry by, or
hearing before the commission when ordered to do so, upon the ground that
the testimony or evidence, book, document, paper, or account required of
such person may tend to incriminate such person in or subject such person
to penalty or forfeiture; but no person shall be prosecuted, punished, or
subjected to any forfeiture or penalty for or on account of any act,
transaction, matter, or thing concerning which such person shall have
been compelled under oath to testify or produce documentary evidence,
except that no person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution or
punishment for any perjury committed by such person in his or her
testimony. Such immunity shall extend only to a natural person who, in
obedience to a subpoena, gives testimony under oath or produces evidence,
documentary or otherwise, under oath. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed as precluding any person from claiming any right or privilege
available to such person under the Fifth Amendment fifth amendment to the
Constitution of the United States.
(3) After the conclusion of the hearing, the commission shall,
within ten days of the receipt of the transcript or the receipt of the
recommendations from the hearing officer, make and file its findings of
fact and conclusions of law and make and enter an appropriate order. The
hearing officer need not refer to the page and line numbers of the
-42-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
transcript when making his or her recommendation to the commission. Such
findings of fact and conclusions of law shall be in sufficient detail to
enable a court on appeal to determine the controverted questions
presented by the proceedings and whether proper weight was given to the
evidence. If the commission determines that the respondent has
intentionally engaged in or is intentionally engaging in any unlawful
employment practice, it shall issue and cause to be served on such
respondent an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from
such unlawful employment practice and order such other affirmative action
as may be appropriate which may include, but shall not be limited to,
reinstatement or hiring of employees, with or without backpay. Backpay
liability shall not accrue from a date more than two years prior to the
filing of the charge with the commission. Interim earnings or amounts
earnable with reasonable diligence by the person or persons discriminated
against shall operate to reduce the backpay otherwise allowable.
(4) A complainant who has suffered physical, emotional, or financial
harm as a result of a violation of section 48-1104 or 48-1114 may, at any
stage of the proceedings prior to dismissal, file an action directly in
the district court of the county where such alleged violation occurred.
If the complainant files a district court action on the charge, the
complainant shall provide written notice of such filing to the
commission, and such notification shall immediately terminate all
proceedings before the commission. The district court shall file and try
such case as any other civil action, and any successful complainant shall
be entitled to appropriate relief, including temporary or permanent
injunctive relief, general and special damages, reasonable attorney's
fees, and costs.
(5) No order of the commission shall require the admission or
reinstatement of an individual as a member of a labor organization or the
hiring, reinstatement, or promotion of an individual as an employee, or
the payment to him or her of any backpay, if such individual was refused
-43-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
admission, suspended, or expelled, or was refused employment or
advancement or was suspended or discharged for any reason other than
discrimination on account of race, color, religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status or in
violation of section 48-1114. If the commission finds that a respondent
has not engaged in any unfair employment practice, it shall within thirty
days state its findings of fact and conclusions of law. A copy of any
order shall be served upon the person against whom it runs or his or her
attorney and notice thereof shall be given to the other parties to the
proceedings or their attorneys. Such order shall take effect twenty days
after service thereof unless otherwise provided and shall continue in
force either for a period which may be designated therein or until
changed or revoked by the commission.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, until a
transcript of the record of the proceedings is filed in the district
court as provided in section 48-1120, the commission may, at any time
upon reasonable notice and in such a manner it shall deem proper, modify
or set aside, in whole or in part, any finding or order made by it.
Sec. 36. Section 48-1122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1122 Every contract to which the state or any of its political
subdivisions is a party shall contain a provision requiring the
contractor and his or her subcontractors not to discriminate against any
employee or applicant for employment, to be employed in the performance
of such contract, with respect to his or her hire, tenure, terms,
conditions, or privileges of employment, because of his or her race,
color, religion, sex, disability, or national origin, or military or
veteran status.
Sec. 37. Section 48-1124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-1124 Nothing contained in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice
-44-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
Act shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of the civil rights
law, any other law of this state, or any municipal ordinance relating to
discrimination because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, disability,
or national origin, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 38. The inclusion of military or veteran status as a protected
class in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act and sections 23-2525,
23-2531, and 23-2541:
(1) Is not intended to duplicate or mirror the protections offered
by the federal Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act
of 1994, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.;
(2) Does not require an employer or other covered entity to treat a
servicemember who is absent from work differently than an individual who
is not a servicemember;
(3) Does not prohibit the granting of special benefits to veterans
or servicemembers on an otherwise nondiscriminatory basis; and
(4) Does not prohibit veterans' preference programs.
Sec. 39. Section 49-801, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-801 Unless the context is shown to intend otherwise, words and
phrases in the statutes of Nebraska hereafter enacted are used in the
following sense:
(1) Acquire when used in connection with a grant of power or
property right to any person includes shall include the purchase, grant,
gift, devise, bequest, and obtaining by eminent domain;
(2) Action includes shall include any proceeding in any court of
this state;
(3) Attorney means shall mean attorney at law;
(4) Company includes shall include any corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, joint-stock company, joint venture, or
association;
(5) Domestic when applied to corporations means shall mean all those
-45-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
created by authority of this state;
(6) Federal refers shall refer to the United States;
(7) Foreign when applied to corporations includes shall include all
those created by authority other than that of this state;
(8) Grantee includes shall include every person to whom any estate
or interest passes in or by any conveyance;
(9) Grantor includes shall include every person from or by whom any
estate or interest passes in or by any conveyance;
(10) Inhabitant shall be construed to mean a resident in the
particular locality in reference to which that word is used;
(11) Land or real estate includes shall include lands, tenements,
and hereditaments and all rights thereto and interest therein other than
a chattel interest;
(12) Magistrate includes shall include judge of the county court and
clerk magistrate;
(13) Military or veteran status means a person:
(a) Is serving active duty service in the armed forces of the United
States, including any reserve component or the National Guard;
(b) Has served on such active duty and was discharged or otherwise
separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under
honorable conditions); or
(c) Is a dependent, as defined in 50 U.S.C. 3911, of a person
described in subdivision (13)(a) or (b) of this section;
(14) (13) Month means shall mean calendar month;
(15) (14) Oath includes shall include affirmation in all cases in
which an affirmation may be substituted for an oath;
(16) (15) Peace officer includes shall include sheriffs, coroners,
jailers, marshals, police officers, state highway patrol officers,
members of the National Guard on active service by direction of the
Governor during periods of emergency, and all other persons with similar
authority to make arrests;
-46-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(17) (16) Person includes shall include bodies politic and
corporate, societies, communities, the public generally, individuals,
partnerships, limited liability companies, joint-stock companies, and
associations;
(18) (17) Personal estate includes shall include money, goods,
chattels, claims, and evidences of debt;
(19) (18) Process means shall mean a summons, subpoena, or notice to
appear issued out of a court in the course of judicial proceedings;
(20) (19) Service animal has shall have the same meaning as in 28
C.F.R. 36.104, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2008;
(21) (20) State when applied to different states of the United
States shall be construed to extend to and include the District of
Columbia and the several territories organized by Congress;
(22) (21) Sworn includes shall include affirmed in all cases in
which an affirmation may be substituted for an oath;
(23) (22) The United States includes shall include territories,
outlying possessions, and the District of Columbia;
(24) (23) Violate includes shall include failure to comply with;
(25) (24) Writ shall signify an order or citation in writing issued
in the name of the state out of a court or by a judicial officer; and
(26) (25) Year means shall mean calendar year.
Sec. 40. Section 51-211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
51-211 (1) The library board may erect, lease, or occupy an
appropriate building for the use of a library, appoint a suitable
librarian and assistants, fix the compensation of such appointees, and
remove such appointees at the pleasure of the board. The governing body
of the county, city, or village in which the library is located shall
approve any personnel administrative or compensation policy or procedure
before implementation of such policy or procedure by the library board.
(2) The library board may establish rules and regulations for the
-47-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
government of such library as may be deemed necessary for its
preservation and to maintain its usefulness and efficiency. The library
board may fix and impose, by general rules, penalties and forfeitures for
trespasses upon or injury to the library grounds, rooms, books, or other
property, for failure to return any book, or for violation of any bylaw,
rule, or regulation and fix and impose reasonable fees, not to exceed the
library's actual cost, for nonbasic services. The board shall have and
exercise such power as may be necessary to carry out the spirit and
intent of sections 51-201 to 51-219 in establishing and maintaining a
public library and reading room.
(3) The public library shall make its basic services available
without charge to all residents of the political subdivision which
supplies its tax support.
(4) No service shall be denied to any person because of race, sex,
religion, age, color, national origin, ancestry, physical handicap, or
marital status, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 41. Section 58-216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-216 Low-income or moderate-income person shall mean any person
irrespective of race, religion, creed, national origin, or sex, or
military or veteran status determined by the authority to be eligible for
such assistance as is made available by the Nebraska Investment Finance
Authority Act on account of insufficient personal or family income,
taking into consideration without limiting the generality thereof such
factors as:
(1) The amount of income of such person available for housing needs;
(2) Size of family;
(3) Cost and condition of housing available;
(4) Whether such person is elderly, infirm, or disabled;
(5) The ability of such person to compete successfully in the normal
private housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise
-48-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
is providing sanitary, safe, and uncrowded housing; and
(6) Existing federal guidelines or standards for determining low
income and moderate income.
Sec. 42. Section 58-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-808 Private health care institution means any private not-for-
profit corporation or institution that (1) is licensed under the Health
Care Facility Licensure Act, (2) is described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and is exempt from federal income taxation under
section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (3) is located within this
state and is not owned or controlled by the state or any political
subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district, or municipality thereof,
and (4) does not violate any Nebraska or federal law against
discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, national origin,
ancestry, age, gender, or handicap, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 43. Section 58-809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-809 Private institution of higher education means a not-for-
profit educational institution located within this state which is not
owned or controlled by the state or any political subdivision, agency,
instrumentality, district, or municipality thereof, which is authorized
by law to provide a program of education beyond the high school level,
and which:
(1) Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate
of graduation from a high school or the recognized equivalent of such a
certificate;
(2) Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's
degree; provides an educational program, admission into which is
conditioned upon the prior attainment of a bachelor's degree or its
equivalent, for which it awards a postgraduate degree; provides a program
of not less than two years in length which is acceptable for full credit
-49-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
toward a bachelor's degree; or offers a two-year program in engineering,
mathematics, or the physical or biological sciences which is designed to
prepare the student to work as a technician and at a semiprofessional
level in engineering, research, medicine, or other technological fields
which require the understanding and application of basic engineering,
scientific, or mathematical principles or knowledge;
(3) Is accredited by an accrediting agency or association or, if not
so accredited, is an institution whose credits are accepted, on transfer,
by not less than three institutions which are so accredited, for credit
on the same basis as if transferred from an institution so accredited;
and
(4) Has a student admissions policy that does not violate any other
Nebraska or federal law against discrimination on the basis of race,
color, creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, or handicap, or
military or veteran status.
Sec. 44. Section 58-810, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-810 Private social services institution means any private not-
for-profit corporation or institution that (1) provides health, safety,
and welfare assistance, including emergency, social, housing, and related
support services, to members of the general public in the state, (2) is
described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is exempt
from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue
Code, (3) is located within this state and is not owned or controlled by
the state or any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality,
district, or municipality thereof, and (4) does not violate any Nebraska
or federal law against discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed,
national origin, ancestry, age, gender, or handicap, or military or
veteran status.
Sec. 45. Section 68-1605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-50-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
68-1605 (1) The department shall use the funds in the Homeless
Shelter Assistance Trust Fund to finance grants for projects or programs
that provide for persons or families with special housing needs.
(2) Projects and programs to which funds shall be provided include
eligible community, neighborhood-based, housing-assistance organizations,
institutions, associations, and societies or corporations that:
(a) Are exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01;
(b) Do not discriminate on the basis of age, religion, sex, race,
color, or national origin, or military or veteran status. This
subdivision does not prohibit otherwise nondiscriminatory conduct
designed to benefit veterans or servicemembers or their family members,
such as providing housing limited to veterans or servicemembers or their
family members, or otherwise offering benefits that are limited to
veterans or servicemembers or their family members;
(c) Provide residential housing for at least eight hours of every
twenty-four-hour period; and
(d) Operate a drug-free premises.
(3) The department shall establish an advisory committee consisting
of individuals and groups involved with housing issues, in particular
those pertaining to persons or families with special housing needs, to
advise and assist the department in establishing criteria, priorities,
and guidelines for eligibility requirements, application requirements and
dates, public notification, and monitoring and shall assist the
department in adopting and promulgating rules and regulations for
providing grants from the fund.
(4) An application submitted by an organization representing a
number of eligible applicants may be considered even though the
representing organization may itself not qualify under this section.
(5) In making grants pursuant to the Homeless Shelter Assistance
Trust Fund Act, the department shall consider, but not be limited to, the
-51-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
following factors:
(a) The number of night-lodging units provided by the applicant as
measured by the number of persons housed per night;
(b) Participation by the applicant in community planning processes
and activities aimed at preventing and alleviating homelessness;
(c) Other verifiable units of service provided by the applicant; and
(d) The geographic distribution of funds.
Sec. 46. Section 75-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-325 (1) Every transportation network company shall:
(a) Provide the commission with its email address and customer
service telephone number;
(b) Display for the passenger either a picture of the driver's
personal vehicle and a picture of the driver or the license plate number
of the driver's personal vehicle on the online-enabled application or
platform that a transportation network company uses to connect drivers
and passengers;
(c) Maintain an agent for service of process in Nebraska;
(d) Maintain accurate and up-to-date records of all drivers
providing services on behalf of the transportation network company,
including the vehicle identification number for all personal vehicles to
be operated in connection with the transportation network company;
(e)(i) Implement, enforce, and maintain a zero-tolerance policy on
the use of drugs or alcohol applicable to any driver providing service
for the transportation network company that prohibits a driver from using
any amount of drugs or alcohol while the driver is providing service,
(ii) provide a copy of the policy to the commission promptly upon
adoption, and (iii) provide a copy of any revision to the policy promptly
upon adoption;
(f) Implement an anti-discrimination policy that prohibits
discrimination by any driver providing service for the company on the
-52-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
basis of race, national origin, religion, gender, physical or mental
disability, medical condition, marital status, or age, or military or
veteran status and file the policy with the commission;
(g) Maintain a website that provides a customer service telephone
number or email address of the transportation network company and that
provides the telephone number and email address of the commission;
(h) Establish a driver training program designed to ensure that each
driver safely operates his or her personal vehicle prior to the driver
being able to offer services on the transportation network company's
online-enabled application or platform;
(i) Maintain records required under sections 75-301 to 75-343 to be
collected by the transportation network company, including records
regarding participating drivers; and
(j) Cooperate with the commission and any employees, investigators,
or duly authorized agents of the commission in the investigation of
complaints received by the commission from the public or in
investigations initiated by the commission.
(2) A transportation network company shall not allow a driver to
provide service if the company finds the driver to be in violation of its
zero-tolerance policy required pursuant to subdivision (1)(e) of this
section or if the driver has not successfully completed driver training
pursuant to subdivision (1)(h) of this section. The transportation
network company shall provide on its website and its online-enabled
application or platform notice of the zero-tolerance policy and the
procedures to report a complaint about a driver with whom the passenger
was matched when the passenger reasonably suspects the driver was under
the influence of drugs or alcohol during the course of the prearranged
ride. Upon receiving a complaint, a transportation network company shall
immediately suspend the driver against whom the complaint was issued and
conduct an investigation of the alleged violation. The suspension shall
last for the duration of the investigation.
-53-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
(3) If the commission has reasonable cause to believe a
transportation network company is not enforcing the zero-tolerance policy
filed with the commission, the commission shall investigate and, after
notice and hearing, may enter an order requiring the transportation
network company to enforce such policy, which may include suspension of
the participating driver.
Sec. 47. Section 76-1495, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1495 A landlord may not:
(1) Deny rental on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or
national origin, or military or veteran status;
(2) Require any person, as a precondition to renting, leasing, or
otherwise occupying or removing from a mobile home space in a mobile home
park, to pay an entrance or exit fee of any kind unless for services
actually rendered or pursuant to a written agreement. A landlord may
restrict the movement of mobile homes to reasonable hours and may require
that all work in connection with the removal or installation of a mobile
home, including, but not limited to, the hookup or disconnection of
utilities, be done in a good and workmanlike manner;
(3) Deny any resident of a mobile home park the right to sell that
person's mobile home at a price of his or her own choosing. The tenant
shall, prior to selling the mobile home, give notice to the landlord,
including, but not limited to, the name of the prospective purchaser.
Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the landlord may reserve the right to
approve or disapprove the prospective purchaser of the mobile home as a
tenant within ten days after receiving notice of the intended sale. Any
disapproval shall be in writing and shall be delivered to such tenant
pursuant to section 76-1474. The landlord shall not unreasonably refuse
or restrict the sale by a tenant of a mobile home located in his or her
mobile home park, but the landlord may consider the size, ages, and
composition of the prospective purchaser's family in determining if the
-54-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
mobile home purchaser may leave the home in the park. The landlord may
also, in order to upgrade the quality of the mobile home park, prescribe
reasonable requirements governing the age, physical appearance, size, or
quality of the mobile home. In the event of a sale to a third party or
mutual termination of the rental agreement, the landlord may within ten
days after receiving written notice of the pending sale or mutual
termination require that any mobile home that is no longer appropriate
for the mobile home park or that is in disrepair be repaired to the
landlord's satisfaction or removed from the park within sixty days. The
landlord shall specify in writing the reasons for disapproval of the
mobile home;
(4) Exact a commission or fee with respect to the price realized by
the tenant selling the mobile home, unless the park owner or operator has
acted as agent for the mobile home owner pursuant to a written agreement;
or
(5) Require a tenant to furnish permanent improvements which cannot
be removed by the tenant without damage to the mobile home or mobile home
space at the expiration of the rental agreement.
Sec. 48. Section 81-885.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-885.24 The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon
the sworn complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of
any broker, associate broker, salesperson, or subdivider, may censure the
licensee or certificate holder, revoke or suspend any license or
certificate issued under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, or enter
into consent orders, and, alone or in combination with such disciplinary
actions, may impose a civil fine on a licensee pursuant to section
81-885.10, whenever the license or certificate has been obtained by false
or fraudulent representation or the licensee or certificate holder has
been found guilty of any of the following unfair trade practices:
(1) Refusing because of religion, race, color, national origin,
-55-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
ethnic group, sex, familial status, or disability, or military or veteran
status to show, sell, or rent any real estate for sale or rent to
prospective purchasers or renters;
(2) Intentionally using advertising which is misleading or
inaccurate in any material particular or in any way misrepresents any
property, terms, values, policies, or services of the business conducted;
(3) Failing to account for and remit any money coming into his or
her possession belonging to others;
(4) Commingling the money or other property of his or her principals
with his or her own;
(5) Failing to maintain and deposit in a separate trust account all
money received by a broker acting in such capacity, or as escrow agent or
the temporary custodian of the funds of others, in a real estate
transaction unless all parties having an interest in the funds have
agreed otherwise in writing;
(6) Accepting, giving, or charging any form of undisclosed
compensation, consideration, rebate, or direct profit on expenditures
made for a principal;
(7) Representing or attempting to represent a real estate broker,
other than the employer, without the express knowledge and consent of the
employer;
(8) Accepting any form of compensation or consideration by an
associate broker or salesperson from anyone other than his or her
employing broker without the consent of his or her employing broker;
(9) Acting in the dual capacity of agent and undisclosed principal
in any transaction;
(10) Guaranteeing or authorizing any person to guarantee future
profits which may result from the resale of real property;
(11) Placing a sign on any property offering it for sale or rent
without the written consent of the owner or his or her authorized agent;
(12) Offering real estate for sale or lease without the knowledge
-56-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
and consent of the owner or his or her authorized agent or on terms other
than those authorized by the owner or his or her authorized agent;
(13) Inducing any party to a contract of sale or lease to break such
contract for the purpose of substituting, in lieu thereof, a new contract
with another principal;
(14) Negotiating a sale, exchange, listing, or lease of real estate
directly with an owner or lessor if he or she knows that such owner has a
written outstanding listing contract in connection with such property
granting an exclusive agency or an exclusive right to sell to another
broker or negotiating directly with an owner to withdraw from or break
such a listing contract for the purpose of substituting, in lieu thereof,
a new listing contract;
(15) Discussing or soliciting a discussion of, with an owner of a
property which is exclusively listed with another broker, the terms upon
which the broker would accept a future listing upon the expiration of the
present listing unless the owner initiates the discussion;
(16) Violating any provision of sections 76-2401 to 76-2430;
(17) Soliciting, selling, or offering for sale real estate by
offering free lots or conducting lotteries for the purpose of influencing
a purchaser or prospective purchaser of real estate;
(18) Providing any form of compensation or consideration to any
person for performing the services of a broker, associate broker, or
salesperson who has not first secured his or her license under the
Nebraska Real Estate License Act unless such person is (a) a nonresident
who is licensed in his or her resident regulatory jurisdiction or (b) a
citizen and resident of a foreign country which does not license persons
conducting the activities of a broker and such person provides reasonable
written evidence to the Nebraska broker that he or she is a resident
citizen of that foreign country, is not a resident of this country, and
conducts the activities of a broker in that foreign country;
(19) Failing to include a fixed date of expiration in any written
-57-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
listing agreement and failing to leave a copy of the agreement with the
principal;
(20) Failing to deliver within a reasonable time a completed and
dated copy of any purchase agreement or offer to buy or sell real estate
to the purchaser and to the seller;
(21) Failing by a broker to deliver to the seller in every real
estate transaction, at the time the transaction is consummated, a
complete, detailed closing statement showing all of the receipts and
disbursements handled by such broker for the seller, failing to deliver
to the buyer a complete statement showing all money received in the
transaction from such buyer and how and for what the same was disbursed,
and failing to retain true copies of such statements in his or her files;
(22) Making any substantial misrepresentations;
(23) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the
knowledge of all parties for whom he or she acts;
(24) Failing by an associate broker or salesperson to place, as soon
after receipt as practicable, in the custody of his or her employing
broker any deposit money or other money or funds entrusted to him or her
by any person dealing with him or her as the representative of his or her
licensed broker;
(25) Filing a listing contract or any document or instrument
purporting to create a lien based on a listing contract for the purpose
of casting a cloud upon the title to real estate when no valid claim
under the listing contract exists;
(26) Violating any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the
commission in the interest of the public and consistent with the Nebraska
Real Estate License Act;
(27) Failing by a subdivider, after the original certificate has
been issued, to comply with all of the requirements of the Nebraska Real
Estate License Act;
(28) Conviction of a felony or entering a plea of guilty or nolo
-58-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
contendere to a felony charge by a broker or salesperson;
(29) Demonstrating negligence, incompetency, or unworthiness to act
as a broker, associate broker, or salesperson, whether of the same or of
a different character as otherwise specified in this section;
(30) Inducing or attempting to induce a person to transfer an
interest in real property, whether or not for monetary gain, or
discouraging another person from purchasing real property, by
representing that (a) a change has occurred or will or may occur in the
composition with respect to religion, race, color, national origin,
ethnic group, sex, familial status, or disability of the owners or
occupants in the block, neighborhood, or area or (b) such change will or
may result in the lowering of property values, an increase in criminal or
antisocial behavior, or a decline in the quality of schools in the block,
neighborhood, or area;
(31) Failing by a team leader to provide a current list of all team
members to his or her designated broker;
(32) Failing by a designated broker to maintain a record of all team
leaders and team members working under him or her;
(33) Utilizing advertising which does not prominently display the
name under which the designated broker does business as filed with the
commission;
(34) Utilizing team advertising or a team name suggesting the team
is an independent real estate brokerage;
(35) Charging or collecting, as part or all of his or her
compensation or consideration, any part of the earnest money or other
money paid to him or her or the entity under which he or she does
business in connection with any real estate transaction until the
transaction has been consummated or terminated. However, a payment for
goods or services rendered by a third party on behalf of the client shall
not be considered compensation or consideration if such payment does not
include any profit, compensation, or payment for services rendered by the
-59-

LB694 LB694
2025 2025
broker and the broker retains a record of the payment to the third party
for such goods or services;
(36) Failing to provide a copy of section 81-885.04 or written
instructions explaining the provisions of the exemption from licensure as
set forth in subdivision (9) of section 81-885.04 to any unlicensed
person who assists in procuring a potential client or customer as defined
in sections 76-2407 and 76-2409, respectively, for the purpose of the
listing, sale, purchase, exchange, renting, leasing, or optioning of any
real estate; or
(37) Offering or entering into a right-to-list home sale agreement.
Sec. 49. Original sections 18-1724, 20-113, 20-132, 20-134, 20-139,
20-317, 20-318, 20-320, 20-321, 20-322, 20-325, 23-2525, 23-2531,
23-2541, 29-401, 45-1056, 48-215, 48-628.13, 48-1101, 48-1104, 48-1105,
48-1106, 48-1107, 48-1108, 48-1111, 48-1113, 48-1115, 48-1117, 48-1119,
48-1122, 48-1124, 48-1125, 49-801, 51-211, 58-216, 58-808, 58-809,
58-810, 68-1605, 75-325, 76-1495, and 81-885.24, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, and sections 25-1645, 32-221, 32-230, 39-210, and 45-1303,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-60-